Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2104, as
amended by Section 237, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2104), is amended to read as follows:
A. The value of any motor vehicle, except a manufactured home,
for the purposes of the excise tax levied by Section 2103 of this
title, shall be determined as of the time the person applying for a
certificate of title thereto obtained either ownership or possession
of the vehicle, which shall be presumed to be the actual date of the
sale or other transfer of ownership, and assignment of the
certificate of title.

Req. No. 10276 Page 1

B. The value of any vehicle, for purposes of the excise tax
levied by Section 2103 of this title, shall be the actual sales
price of such a vehicle before any discounts or credits are given
for a trade-in. However, the value of the vehicle prior to the
subtraction of such discounts or credits for a trade-in shall be
required to be within twenty:
1. Twenty percent (20%) of the average retail price value of
such vehicle as listed in the automotive reference material
prescribed by Service Oklahoma. if the vehicle has an odometer
reading of less than one hundred thousand (100,000) miles;
2. Forty percent (40%) of the average retail price value of
such vehicle as listed in the automotive reference material
prescribed by Service Oklahoma if the vehicle has an odometer
reading equal to or greater than one hundred thousand (100,000)
miles, but not greater than two hundred thousand (200,000) miles;
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the average retail price value of
such vehicle as listed in the automotive reference material
prescribed by Service Oklahoma if the vehicle has an odometer
reading equal to or greater than two hundred thousand and one
(200,001) miles.
The actual sales price of the vehicle, which total shall be the
basis of the motor vehicle excise tax, as well as the number of
tires on the vehicle and the tire rim diameters, shall be entered on

Req. No. 10276 Page 2

the bill of sale furnished by the seller to the purchaser, or on
such other form as may be prescribed by Service Oklahoma.
Upon receipt of the properly completed bill of sale or other
form as prescribed by Service Oklahoma, and the payment of all
applicable taxes and fees, Service Oklahoma or an appointed licensed
operator shall issue a vehicle certificate of title in accordance
with the provisions of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration
Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10276 AO 12/17/24









Req. No. 10276 Page 3